src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON п_b/c'_сравн._затрудн.
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_end_Prb ;

LEXICON п_b/c'~
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c' ;

LEXICON п_b/c's~
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c'_Prb ;

LEXICON п_b/c''
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c'' ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b—
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF—_b ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b?
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_b_Prb ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b?~
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_b_Prb ;

LEXICON п_[мс_6a]ий
+A+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+A+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+A+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>ою # ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
+A+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+A+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
+A+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
+A+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
+A+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
+A+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON п_[мс_1a]ин
+A: мс_1a_Msc ;
+A: мс_1a_Neu ;
+A: мс_1a_Fem ;
+A: мс_1a_Pl ;

LEXICON мс_1a_Msc
+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс_1a_Neu
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс_1a_Fem
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>ою # ;

LEXICON мс_1a_Pl
+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON п_[мс_1a]ын
п_[мс_1a]ин	;

LEXICON п_[мс_1a]ев
п_[мс_1a]ов ;

LEXICON п_[мс_1a]ов
+A+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+A+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+A+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>ою # ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
+A+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+A+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
+A+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
+A+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
+A+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
+A+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON п_[мс_a]нь
п_[мс_1a]ов ;

LEXICON п_[мс_1b]ин
+A+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+A+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+A+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>а́ # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>а́ # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>е́ # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>у́ # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>а́ # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>е́ # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>у́ # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>о́й # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>о́й # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>о́й # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>о́й # ;
+A+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>о́ю # ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;
+A+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;
+A+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х # ;
+A+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х # ;
+A+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х # ;
+A+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м # ;
+A+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми # ;

LEXICON п_[мс_1b]ов
+A+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+A+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>а́ # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>е́ # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>у́ # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;
+A+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;
+A+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;
+A+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х # ;
+A+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х # ;
+A+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м # ;
+A+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми # ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
+A+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+A+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
+A+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
+A+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
+A+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

! =====================================================================
! =====================================================================
! =====================================================================

LEXICON LF_stem
+Msc+Sg+Nom:%>ый # ;
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:%>ый # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>ое # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>ое # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>ая # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>ую # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>ою # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>ые # ;
+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ые # ;
+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON LF_stem_Prb
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Prb:%>ый # ;
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc+Prb:%>ый # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc+Prb:%>ого # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Prb:%>ого # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc+Prb:%>ом # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Prb:%>ому # ;
+Msc+Sg+Ins+Prb:%>ым # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Prb:%>ое # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Prb:%>ое # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Prb:%>ого # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc+Prb:%>ом # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Prb:%>ому # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins+Prb:%>ым # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Prb:%>ая # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Prb:%>ую # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Prb:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc+Prb:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Prb:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Prb:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac+Prb:%>ою # ;
+Pl+Nom+Prb:%>ые # ;
+Inan+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>ые # ;
+Anim+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Gen+Prb:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Loc+Prb:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Dat+Prb:%>ым # ;
+Pl+Ins+Prb:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON LF_stem_Fac
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Fac:%>ый # ;
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc+Fac:%>ый # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc+Fac:%>ого # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Fac:%>ого # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc+Fac:%>ом # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Fac:%>ому # ;
+Msc+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>ым # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Fac:%>ое # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Fac:%>ое # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Fac:%>ого # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc+Fac:%>ом # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Fac:%>ому # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>ым # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Fac:%>ая # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Fac:%>ую # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Fac:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc+Fac:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Fac:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>ою # ;
+Pl+Nom+Fac:%>ые # ;
+Inan+Pl+Acc+Fac:%>ые # ;
+Anim+Pl+Acc+Fac:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Loc+Fac:%>ых # ;
+Pl+Dat+Fac:%>ым # ;
+Pl+Ins+Fac:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON LF_stem_R
+Msc+Sg+Nom:%>ыйся # ;
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:%>ыйся # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>огося # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>огося # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>омся # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>омуся # ;
+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ымся # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>оеся # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>оеся # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>огося # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>омся # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>омуся # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ымся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>аяся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>уюся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ойся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>ойся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>ойся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ойся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>оюся # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>ыеся # ;
+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ыеся # ;
+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ыхся # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>ыхся # ;
+Pl+Loc:%>ыхся # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ымся # ;
+Pl+Ins:%>ымися # ;

LEXICON LF_stem_R_Prb
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Prb:%>ыйся # ;
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc+Prb:%>ыйся # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc+Prb:%>огося # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Prb:%>огося # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc+Prb:%>омся # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Prb:%>омуся # ;
+Msc+Sg+Ins+Prb:%>ымся # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Prb:%>оеся # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Prb:%>оеся # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Prb:%>огося # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc+Prb:%>омся # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Prb:%>омуся # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins+Prb:%>ымся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Prb:%>аяся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Prb:%>уюся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Prb:%>ойся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc+Prb:%>ойся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Prb:%>ойся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Prb:%>ойся # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Prb:%>оюся # ;
+Pl+Nom+Prb:%>ыеся # ;
+Inan+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>ыеся # ;
+Anim+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>ыхся # ;
+Pl+Gen+Prb:%>ыхся # ;
+Pl+Loc+Prb:%>ыхся # ;
+Pl+Dat+Prb:%>ымся # ;
+Pl+Ins+Prb:%>ымися # ;
