src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
кощеев:коще́ев п_[мс_1a]ев ;                      	! Z <мс 1a> 
авгиев:а́вгиев п_[мс_1a]ев ;                      	! Z <мс 1a> 
гордиев:го́рдиев п_[мс_1a]ев ;                    	! Z <мс 1a> 
фаллопиев:фалло́пиев п_[мс_1a]ев ;                	! Z <мс 1a> 
израилев:изра́илев п_[мс_1a]ев ;                  	! RNC <мс 1a> 
государев:госуда́рев п_[мс_1a]ев ;                	! Z <мс 1a> 
царев:царе́в п_[мс_1a]ев ;                        	! Z <мс 1a> 
тестев:те́стев п_[мс_1a]ев ;                      	! Z <мс 1a> 
успеньев:успе́ньев п_[мс_1a]ев ;                  	! Z <мс 1a> 
бабкин:ба́бкин п_[мс_1a]ин ;                      	! Z <мс 1a> 
хозяйкин:хозя́йкин п_[мс_1a]ин ;                  	! Z <мс 1a> 
дочкин:до́чкин п_[мс_1a]ин ;                      	! Z <мс 1a> 
девушкин:де́вушкин п_[мс_1a]ин ;                  	! RNC <мс 1a> 
нянюшкин:ня́нюшкин п_[мс_1a]ин ;                  	! Z <мс 1a> 
дяденькин:дя́денькин п_[мс_1a]ин ;                	! Znew <мс 1a> 
ведьмин:ве́дьмин п_[мс_1a]ин ;                    	! Znew <мс 1a> 
папин:па́пин п_[мс_1a]ин ;                        	! Z <мс 1a> 
мачехин:ма́чехин п_[мс_1a]ин ;                    	! Z <мс 1a> 
архимедов:архиме́дов п_[мс_1a]ов ;                	! Znew <мс 1a> 
племянников:племя́нников п_[мс_1a]ов ;            	! Z <мс 1a> 
лукуллов:луку́ллов п_[мс_1a]ов ;                  	! Z <мс 1a> 
кумов:ку́мов п_[мс_1a]ов ;                        	! Z <мс 1a> 
драконов:драко́нов п_[мс_1a]ов ;                  	! Z <мс 1a> 
попов:попо́в п_[мс_1a]ов ;                        	! Z <мс 1a> 
пирров:пи́рров п_[мс_1a]ов ;                      	! Z <мс 1a> 
бертолетов:бертоле́тов п_[мс_1a]ов ;              	! Z <мс 1a> 
вольтов:во́льтов п_[мс_1a]ов ;                    	! Z <мс 1a> 
племянницын:племя́нницын п_[мс_1a]ын ;            	! Z <мс 1a> 
троицын:тро́ицын п_[мс_1a]ын ;                    	! Z <мс 1a> 
сестрицын:сестри́цын п_[мс_1a]ын ;                	! Z <мс 1a> 
курицын:ку́рицын п_[мс_1a]ын ;                    	! Z <мс 1a> 
фомин:фоми́н п_[мс_1b]ин ;                        	! Z <мс 1b> 
ильин:ильи́н п_[мс_1b]ин ;                        	! Z <мс 1b> 
петров:петро́в п_[мс_1b]ов ;                    	! Z <мс, 1a// 1b> 
господень:госпо́д%^Fень п_[мс_a]нь ;          	! Z <мс 2*a> 
наважий:нава́ж%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий ;                 	! Z <мс 6*a> 
бродяжий:бродя́ж%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий ;               	! Z <мс 6*a> 
кобылий:кобы́л%^ьFий п_[мс_6a]ий ;                	! Z <мс 6*a> 
павлиний:павли́н%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий ;               	! Z <мс 6*a> 
лососий:лосо́с%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий ;                 	! Z <мс 6*a> 
рачий:ра́ч%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий ;                     	! Z <мс 6*a> 
исправничий:испра́внич%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий ;         	! Z <мс 6*a> 
лисичий:лиси́ч%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий ;                 	! Z <мс 6*a> 
цыплячий:цыпля́ч%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий ;               	! Z <мс 6*a> 
лихой¹⁻²:ли́х п_b/c'_сравн._затрудн. ;          	! Znew 3b/c' сравн. затрудн.
дрянной:дрян%^Fён п_b/c'' ;                       	! Z 1*b/c'' 
полуседой:полусе́д п_b/c'~ ;                      	! Znew 1b/c'~ 
недурной:неду́р%^Fен п_b/c'~ ;                    	! Z 1*b/c'~ %tr% кф м неду/рен // недурён
непростой:непро́ст п_b/c'~ ;                      	! Z 1b/c'~ 
полупустой:полупу́ст п_b/c'~ ;                    	! Z 1b/c'~ 
неплохой:непло́х п_b/c'~ ;                        	! Z 3b/c'~ 
полуглухой:полуглу́х п_b/c'~ ;                    	! Znew 3b/c'~ 
полусухой:полусу́х п_b/c'~ ;                      	! Z 3b/c'~ 
кулевой:куле́в п_b? ;                             	! Z 1b%[x]% 
остевой:осте́в п_b? ;                             	! Z 1b%[x]% 
неходовой:неходо́в п_b? ;                         	! Z 1b%[x]% 
жерновой:жерно́в п_b? ;                           	! Z 1b%[x]% 
шихтовой:шихто́в п_b? ;                           	! Z 1b%[x]% 
обшивной:обши́вн п_b? ;                           	! Z 1b%[x]% 
раздвижной:раздви́жн п_b? ;                       	! Z 1b%[x]% 
куренной:куре́нн п_b? ;                           	! Z 1b%[x]% 
получетвертной:получетве́ртн п_b? ;               	! Z 1b%[x]% 
ворсяной:ворся́н п_b? ;                           	! Z 1b%[x]% 
ведьмовской:ведьмо́вск п_b?~ ;                    	! Z 3b%[x]%~ 
сватовской:свато́вск п_b?~ ;                      	! Z 3b%[x]%~ 
мотовской:мото́вск п_b?~ ;                        	! Z 3b%[x]%~ 
серпуховской:серпухо́вск п_b?~ ;                  	! Z 3b%[x]%~ 
межзаводской:мѐжзаво́дск п_b?~ ;                 	! Z 3b%[x]%~ 
внегородской:внѐгоро́дск п_b?~ ;                 	! Z 3b%[x]%~ 
мужской:му́жск п_b?~ ;                            	! Z 3b%[x]%~ 
двинской:дви́нск п_b?~ ;                          	! Z 3b%[x]%~ 
мирской:ми́рск п_b?~ ;                            	! Z 3b%[x]%~ 
